Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 3. Alternative Fuel Taxes

§ 39-17-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Accountable product” means any product that is subject to the reporting requirements of this state, regardless of its intended use or taxability;

“Agricultural purposes” means the cultivation of soil, raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, grazing, training and management of livestock, bees, poultry, furbearing animals and wildlife for gain, sale or profit, but excluding a custom operation;

“Alternative fuels” includes pure methanol, ethanol and other alcohols, blends of eighty-five percent (85%) or more of alcohol with gasoline, natural gas, liquid fuels produced from natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or propane, coal-derived liquid fuels, hydrogen, electricity, pure biodiesel (B100), fuels other than alcohol which are derived from biological materials, renewable diesel and P-Series fuels. The state of Wyoming may designate other fuels as alternative fuels if not previously defined as fuels under this chapter;

“Billed gallons” means the gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) or diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) billed to the customer;

“Biodiesel” means a fuel comprised of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids generally derived from vegetable oils or animal fats, designated B100, and meeting the requirements of ASTM D6751 for use in diesel engines;

“Biodiesel blend” means a blend of biodiesel fuel meeting ASTM D6751 with petroleum based diesel fuel, designated Bxx, where xx represents the volume percentage of biodiesel fuel in the blend. The department shall promulgate rules to designate xx for the purposes of this article;

“Bulk alternative fuel” means thirty-five (35) gallons or more or the gasoline gallon equivalent, diesel gallon equivalent or gasoline gallon equivalent for electricity delivered at one (1) time, excluding alternative fuels delivered into the attached tanks or auxiliary tanks of a licensed motor vehicle;

“Bulk plant” means a fuel storage and distribution facility, other than a terminal, from which accountable product may be removed at a rack;

“Common carrier” means a person, including a railroad operator, who transports accountable product and who does not own the product;

“Commercial vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(i);

“Compressed natural gas” or “CNG” means natural gas which is compressed and stored in high-pressure containers. It is used as a fuel for natural gas-powered vehicles;

“Custom operation” means any agricultural purpose done for hire;

“Dealer” means any person who sells or offers to sell alternative fuel at a specific location in this state, including any person selling or offering to sell alternative fuel at Wyoming airports;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Diesel gallon equivalent” or “DGE” means the diesel gallon equivalent applied to liquefied natural gas in the amount of six and six hundredths (6.06) pounds of liquefied natural gas;

“Dispenser” means the point of taxation for compressed natural gas and liquefied natural gas. The “dispenser” is the point where the gas is delivered into the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle;

“Distributor” means any person, other than a dealer, who receives alternative fuel or blends fuel used to propel a motor vehicle for distribution or resale in this state;

“E-85” means an accountable product resulting from an eighty-five percent (85%) ethanol and fifteen percent (15%) blend of gasoline or which otherwise conforms to the standards as provided in W.S. 40-7-102(a)(xxvi);

“Electric energy” means the amount of work accomplished by electrical power, usually measured in kilowatt hours (kWh);

“End user” means any person who uses alternative fuel within this state for the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle upon a highway;

“Ethanol” means a colorless, odorless liquid produced synthetically by cracking ethane using ethane from natural gas or naphtha from crude oil, by fermentation from crop biomass such as sugar and corn or from waste products such as household waste and paper mill sludge through chemical decomposition and fermentation. “Ethanol” is also known as ethyl-alcohol or alcohol;

“Export” means to obtain alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle in this state for sale or other distribution in another state. Alternative fuel delivered out of the state of Wyoming by or for the purchaser constitutes an export by the purchaser;

“Exporter” means a person, other than a supplier, who purchases alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle in this state for the purpose of transporting or delivering, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, the alternative fuel to another jurisdiction;

“Gallon” means a gallon as measured on a gross basis as defined in this section;

“Gasoline gallon equivalent” or “GGE” means the gasoline gallon equivalent applied to nonliquefied compressed natural gas in the amount of five and sixty-six hundredths (5.66) pounds of compressed natural gas. The gasoline gallon equivalent applied to electricity is 33.56 kilowatt hours (kWh);

“Gross gallon” means a measured gallon without temperature or barometric adjustments;

“Highway” means any road, thoroughfare or public way of any kind in Wyoming except United States forest service development roads and any public highway which is required to be maintained entirely at private expense;

“Hybrid electric vehicle” means a vehicle that uses two (2) or more distinct power sources to move the vehicle. “Hybrid electric vehicle” includes a vehicle which includes an internal combustion engine and one (1) or more electric motors but vehicles which use other mechanisms to capture and use energy may also be included;

“Hydrogen” means the chemical element which can be used as a fuel;

“Import” means to bring alternative fuel for use as a motor vehicle fuel into this state by any means of conveyance other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle. Alternative fuel delivered into this state from out of state by or for the seller constitutes an import by the seller, and alternative fuel delivered by or for the purchaser constitutes an import for the purchaser;

“Importer” means a person, other than a supplier, who purchases alternative fuel outside of this state for the purpose of transporting or delivering, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, the alternative fuel into this state for sale, use or distribution within this state as a motor vehicle fuel;

“Lessor” means any person who, under the terms of a lease, grants the legal right of possession, control of and responsibility for the operation of a vehicle to another person;

“Liquefied natural gas” or “LNG” means natural gas, primarily methane, which has been liquefied by reducing its temperature to negative two hundred sixty (-260) degrees Fahrenheit at atmospheric pressure;

“Liquid petroleum gas” or “LPG” means a gaseous product that has been compressed until it is transformed to a liquid and consists primarily of propane, propylene, butane and butylene in various mixtures. The components of LPG are gases at normal temperature and pressures;

“Methanol” means the clear, colorless liquid which is flammable and used as a fuel or fuel additive;

“Motor vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv);

“P-series fuel” means liquid blend fuels used either alone or mixed with gasoline in any proportion;

“Plug-in electric vehicle” means any motor vehicle that can be recharged from any external source of electricity, including a wall socket, and the electricity stored in the rechargeable battery drives or contributes to drive the wheels of the vehicle. “Plug-in electric vehicle” does not include a hybrid electric vehicle, a motorcycle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(E) or a multipurpose vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);

“Point of taxation” means the point within the fuel supply chain where the tax is collected;

“Position holder” means, with respect to alternative fuel in a terminal, the person who holds the inventory position in the alternative fuel as reflected on the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position when that person has a contractual agreement with the terminal operator for use of the storage facilities or other terminal related services at a terminal with respect to alternative fuel. “Position holder” includes a terminal operator who owns alternative fuel in a terminal;

“Rack” means a mechanism for delivering alternative fuel from a refinery or terminal into a transport truck, railroad car or other means of transfer which is outside of the terminal transfer system. For compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas and liquefied petroleum gas the rack is defined as the dispenser;

“Refiner” means any person who produces, refines, manufactures, blends or compounds alternative fuel in this state if the alternative fuel is used to propel a motor vehicle;

“Renewable diesel”, often referred to as “green diesel” or “second generation diesel”, refers to petrodiesel-like fuels derived from biological sources that are chemically not esters and thus distinct from biodiesel. Renewable diesel is chemically the same as petrodiesel, but it is made of biomass;

“Supplier” means a person who is:

Subject to the general taxing jurisdiction of this state;

Registered pursuant to section 4101 of the federal Internal Revenue Code for transactions in alternative fuels in the bulk transfer/terminal distribution system; and

One (1) of the following:

The position holder in a terminal or refinery in this state;

An importer of alternative fuel into this state from another jurisdiction;

A person who acquires alternative fuel from a terminal or refinery from a position holder pursuant to a two-party exchange; or

The position holder in a terminal or refinery outside this state with respect to alternative fuel which that person imports into this state on the account of that person.

“Supplier” also includes a person who produces alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle in this state, alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle for import into this state into a terminal or acquires fuel through import by truck or railcar into a terminal or refinery.

“Terminal” means an alternative fuel storage and distribution facility that is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which alternative fuel may be removed at a rack;

“Terminal operator” means any person who owns, operates or otherwise controls a terminal;

“Use” or “used” means the consumption of alternative fuel in a motor vehicle upon a highway and includes the reception of alternative fuel into any tank on a motor vehicle which is used by the engine that generates motive power for the vehicle;

“User” means any person who uses alternative fuel within this state in an internal combustion engine for the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle upon a highway;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

As used in this chapter, “motor fuels” means gasoline as defined in W.S. 39-17-101(a)(xii), diesel fuel as defined in W.S. 39-17-201(a)(xxi), and alternative fuels as defined in W.S. 39-17-301(a)(iii).

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(xlix), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-17-301

through

39-17-311

."

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(xxxviii) substituted "that" for "which" in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added "electric" after "hybrid" and ", a motorcycle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(E) or a multipurpose vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M)" at the end.

§ 39-17-302.
Administration; confidentiality.

The administration of this article is vested in the department which shall prescribe the reporting format and forms for the making of returns, and assessment and collection of license taxes and fees hereby imposed. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act necessary to the enforcement of the provisions of this article. All tax returns and records are open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his deputies.

No state employee who by virtue of his employment has knowledge of the business affairs of any person filing or required to file any tax returns under this article shall make known its contents in any manner or permit any person to have access to any returns or information contained therein except as provided by law or in the following cases:

The delivery to the taxpayer or his legal representatives upon written request of a copy of any return or report in connection with his tax;

The publication of statistics so classified to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports;

The inspection by the attorney general of the report or return of any person who brings an action against the state, or against whom an action is contemplated or has been instituted;

The introduction into evidence of any report or return or information there from in any administrative or court proceeding to which the person making the report or return is a party;

The furnishing of any information to the United States government and its territories, the District of Columbia, any state allowing similar privileges to the department or to the multistate tax commission for relay to tax officials of cooperating states. Information furnished shall be only for tax purposes;

The inspection of tax returns and records by the department of audit.

Any person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

The department may enter into cooperative agreements with other jurisdictions, for the exchange of information and auditing of users of alternative fuels used in fleets of motor vehicles operated or intended to operate interstate. An agreement or declaration of amendment is not effective until stated in writing and filed with the department.

An agreement may provide for determining the base jurisdiction for users, users records requirements, audit procedures, exchange of information, persons eligible for tax licensing, defining qualified motor vehicles, determining if bonding is required, specifying reporting requirements and periods including defining uniform penalty and interest rates for late reporting, determining methods for collecting and forwarding of alternative fuel taxes and penalties to another member jurisdiction, paying interest on certain refund requests and other provisions as will facilitate the administration of the agreement.

The department may, as required by the terms of an agreement, forward to officers or agents of another jurisdiction any information in the department’s possession relative to the manufacture, receipts, sale, use, transportation or shipment of alternative fuels by any person. The department may disclose to officers or agents of another member jurisdiction the location of officers, motor vehicles and other real and personal property of users of alternative fuels.

An agreement may provide for each member jurisdiction to audit the records of persons based in the jurisdiction to determine if the alternative fuel taxes due each jurisdiction are properly reported and paid. Each state shall forward the findings of the audits performed on persons based in the jurisdiction to each jurisdiction in which the person has taxable use of alternative fuels. For persons not based in this state and who have taxable use of alternative fuels in this state, the department may serve the audit findings received from another jurisdiction, in the form of an assessment, on the person as though an audit was conducted by the department.

Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section does not preclude the department from auditing the records of any licensee under this chapter.

If the department enters into any agreement under the authority of this section and the provisions set forth in the agreement are in conflict with any rules or regulations promulgated by the department, the agreement provisions prevail.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-303.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied and shall be collected a license tax on all alternative fuel used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state except for those fuels exempted under W.S.

39-17-305

;

The tax imposed by W.S. 39-17-304(a)(iii) shall cease to be collected on the first day of the third month following the date the department of environmental quality notifies the director of the department of transportation that the balance of the corrective action account created by W.S.

35-11-1424

exceeds seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000.00) and the environmental pollution financial responsibility account created by W.S.

35-11-1427

exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000.00). The tax shall again be collected beginning on the first day of the third month following the date the department of environmental quality notifies the director of the department of transportation that the balance of the corrective action account has fallen below eleven million dollars ($11,000,000.00).

Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

The state of Wyoming preempts the field of imposing taxes upon sales of alternative fuels used to propel a motor vehicle and no city, town or county may levy or collect taxes upon the sales of alternative fuels to propel a motor vehicle;

The taxes imposed on alternative fuel shall be conclusively presumed to be a direct tax on the ultimate or retail consumer. When taxes are paid by any person other than the ultimate or retail consumer, the payment shall be considered as pre-collected and as an advance payment of the purpose of convenience and facility to the consumer and shall thereafter be added to the price of the alternative fuel and recovered from the ultimate or retail consumer, regardless of where or how the taxable fuel is ultimately consumed;

Any user not otherwise required to be licensed and report the tax levied pursuant to this section under the provisions of W.S.

39-17-306

or

39-17-307

shall be required to be licensed and report all taxes due under this section pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

39-17-306

and

39-17-307

;

When a supplier, distributor, refiner, importer or exporter imports alternative fuel into or exports alternative fuel from the state of Wyoming in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles, the amount of alternative fuel consumed in the vehicles on Wyoming highways shall be deemed to be the product of the total amount of the alternative fuel consumed in his entire operations within and without this state times the total number of miles traveled on the highways within this state divided by the total number of miles traveled within and without this state. In the absence of mileage records, the department may by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 39-17-302(a) adopt the mileage basis for determining the taxable use of alternative fuel used in those motor vehicles which travel regularly over prescribed courses on and off the highways within the state of Wyoming. In the absence of records showing the number of miles actually operated per gallon of alternative fuel consumed, it shall be presumed that not less than one (1) gallon, gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) or diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) of alternative fuel was consumed for every four (4) miles traveled;

A Wyoming licensed supplier, distributor, refiner or importer who is unable to recover the license taxes due from a bulk sale to a licensee who is other than an end user and is not owned, rented or leased by the supplier, distributor, refiner or importer requesting the credit is not liable for the taxes and may credit the amount of unpaid taxes against a later remittance of taxes required under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(i). The department shall promulgate rules to implement this paragraph.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

A terminal operator or bulk plant operator may rely on the representation made by the purchaser of alternative fuel or the purchaser’s agent concerning the destination state of alternative fuel. A purchaser is liable for any tax due as a result of the purchaser’s diversion of fuel from the represented destination state.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-304.
Taxation rate.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and W.S.

39-17-305

, the total tax on alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle shall be twenty-four cents ($.24) per gallon. The gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) shall be used for compressed natural gas, liquid petroleum gas or electricity. The diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) shall be used for liquefied natural gas or renewable diesel. The rate shall be imposed as follows:

There is levied and shall be collected a license tax of twenty-three cents ($.23) per gallon, gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent as appropriate on all alternative fuel used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state to propel a motor vehicle except for those fuels exempted under W.S.

39-17-305

;

Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, alternative fuel sold for use in aircraft shall be taxed at four cents ($.04) per gallon, gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent as appropriate except for those fuels exempted under W.S. 39-17-305;

In addition to the tax collected pursuant to paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, there is levied and shall be collected a license tax of one cent ($.01) per gallon, gasoline gallon equivalent or diesel gallon equivalent as appropriate on all alternative fuel used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state to propel a motor vehicle except for those fuels exempted under W.S. 39-17-305(a).

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-305.
Exemptions.

Alternative fuel sold for the purposes of propelling a motor vehicle at a Wyoming terminal rack for export by a person licensed as an exporter in this state is exempt from the license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(i) through (iii). This exemption shall not apply to fuel in the supply tank of a motor vehicle. The exempt sales shall be reported on or before the last day of the month in a format required by the department. The sales reports are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following date of sale.

Exchanges or sales of alternative fuel which is sold for the purposes of propelling a motor vehicle between suppliers are exempt from the license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-304(a)(i) through (iii). Alternative fuel directly exported, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a supplier is exempt from the license taxes under this article.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 39-17-306.
Licenses; permits.

Each alternative fuel supplier, refiner, distributor, terminal operator, importer or exporter of alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle shall obtain an annual license from the department to conduct business in this state. Prior to commencing business the supplier, distributor, terminal operator, importer, exporter or refiner shall file an application with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department containing the information specified therein. The fee for each type of license is twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The department may revoke any license granted under this section upon proof of violation of any provision of this article.

Each alternative fuel dealer shall obtain an annual license from the department to conduct business in this state. Prior to commencing business the dealer shall file an application with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department containing the information specified therein. The application for the license shall state the location of each place where alternative fuel is to be sold or offered for sale. The license shall be used only for one (1) specific location by the dealer in whose name it is issued. The license is valid for one (1) year unless surrendered by the dealer for nonuse or revoked by the department. The dealer shall immediately return the license upon the sale or discontinuance of any licensed location. The license fee is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each location. The department may revoke any license granted under this subsection upon proof of violation of any provision of this article.

The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other jurisdictions for the licensing of persons under this section who have been licensed under a similar law in another jurisdiction.

The department may require bonds, or accept in lieu of a bond a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of paragraph (vi) of this subsection, under this article as follows:

When a distributor, supplier or dealer who has been in business for one (1) year or longer and has established a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely with the department violates a provision of this article, the distributor, supplier or dealer shall file a bond with the department equal to the sum of the last available six (6) months tax liability;

The bond shall be executed with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business in this state. In lieu of a corporate surety bond, the department may accept a cash bond made payable to the department. Any interest earned on a cash bond shall accrue to the licensee. The bond shall be:

Approved as to form by the Wyoming attorney general;

Made payable to the department;

Guarantee payment of delinquent taxes, penalties and interest due under this article and the return of the license issued under this article;

Conditioned on the applicant not practicing any fraud, making any fraudulent representation or violating any law relating to the conduct of the business for which the applicant is licensed under this article.

The department may require a bond from any licensee whose license has been revoked or who violates any provision of this article. Any licensee who fails to file any report required under this article, remits insufficient funds or is delinquent in filing any two (2) times in a preceding twelve (12) month period shall be required to post a bond as provided in this subsection. Such bond may be waived by the department after a demonstration of a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely by the licensee for a twelve (12) month period;

Failure to post the required bond or certificate of deposit under this subsection shall result in the denial of a license;

In lieu of a surety or cash bond the department may accept a certificate of deposit under the following requirements:

The certificate of deposit:

Shall be issued by a financial institution authorized to do business in Wyoming and qualified by law to act as a depository of public funds in this state;

Shall be payable not more than one (1) year after being deposited with the department.

The department shall be given a first priority security interest in the certificate of deposit. The certificate of deposit shall not be subject to attachment or execution unless the attachment or execution arises out of a suit for delinquent taxes, penalties and interest due under this article and the return of the license issued under this article. The entire amount of the certificate of deposit shall be forfeited to the state if the licensee practices any fraud, makes any fraudulent representation or violates any law relating to the conduct of the business for which he is licensed under this article;

The certificate of deposit and related documents providing for the security interest and forfeiture shall be approved as to form by the Wyoming attorney general;

The licensee shall pay all cost incurred by the department to perfect its security interest;

Any interest earned on a certificate of deposit shall accrue to the licensee.

No person shall operate a commercial vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-18-101(a)(iii) between Wyoming and other jurisdictions unless the person has a valid international fuel tax agreement license and decals pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

or a temporary permit under W.S.

31-18-201

.

Each applicant for an international fuel tax agreement license and decals shall file an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department and pay the applicable fees for the license and a decal as prescribed by the department pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

.

History.

2015 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.